Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-519
Automobile liability policy; notice; proof of receipt.

Evidence of mailing notice of cancellation, of intention not to renew, or of reasons for cancellation to the named insured's last mailing address known to the insurer shall be sufficient proof of receipt of notice.

Laws 1972, LB 1396, § 6;

Laws 1989, LB 92, § 125.